Georgia, session 2025_26, HB822.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 19 of Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
attorneys generally, is amended by revising Code Section 15-19-3, relating to rules governing
examinations, as follows:
"15-19-3.
(a) The Justices of the Supreme Court shall be authorized to make and adopt rules as to the
making of application to take an examination and as to the time, manner, and places of
holding examinations for admission to the bar of this state and are specifically authorized
to provide for the holding of the examinations under the supervision of the Board of Bar
Examiners at not more than three cities, under such rules and regulations as may be
H. B. 822
- 1 -

LC 59 0005
prescribed by them. They may provide for the examination to be held over such period of
days as in their judgment shall be fair to the applicant for examination. There shall be held
not less than two examinations during each calendar year, the date or dates of which shall
be fixed by the Justices of the Supreme Court.
(b) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as limiting applicants for admission to
the bar to college trained persons, except as provided by law.
(c) On and after July 1, 2025, examinations for admission to the bar of this state shall not
include content specific to the laws of this state."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 822
- 2 -